Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.090

Injunction or similar relief.

A court may enjoin, or grant similar relief that would have the effect of enjoining, a bank from paying a depositor or beneficiary only if payment would constitute a material fraud or facilitate a material fraud with respect to a special deposit.

[ 2024 c 23 s 10.]